Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-1713
Fire training school; contract with city fire department; costs and expenses.

Any city or village in the State of Nebraska may enter into a contract with a fire department of any city of the metropolitan class or city of the primary class that maintains a fire training school for its own firefighters to train such firefighters as such city or village might designate and may pay from city or village funds the cost of such training and all of the expenses of such designated trainees during the time that they are undergoing such training.

Laws 1959, c. 58, § 2, p. 252;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 98.